Utah statutes.
39-1-36.   Reserve member of armed forces -- Leave of absence from
employment -- Liability of employers.
(1)  Any member of a reserve component of the armed forces of the United
States who pursuant to military orders enters active duty, active duty for
training, inactive duty training, or state active duty shall upon request be
granted a leave of absence from employment, but for no more than five years.
(2)  Upon satisfactory release from the training or from hospitalization
incidental to the training, the member shall be permitted to return to the
prior employment with the seniority, status, pay, and vacation the member
would have had as an employee if he had not been absent for military purposes.
(3)  Any employer who willfully deprives an employee who is absent as a member
under Subsection (1) of any of the benefits under Subsection (2) or
discriminates in hiring for any employment position, public or private, based
on membership in any reserve component of the armed forces, is guilty of a
class B misdemeanor.
